Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1903
Traffic, criminal, and juvenile cases; witness fees and mileage.

(1) The amount of the witness fee and mileage in traffic, criminal, and juvenile cases is governed by section 33-139.

(2) A witness in a traffic, criminal, or juvenile case shall be entitled to a witness fee and mileage after appearing in court in response to a subpoena. The clerk of the court shall immediately submit a claim for payment of witness fees and mileage on behalf of all such witnesses to the county clerk in cases involving a violation of state law or to the city clerk in cases involving a violation of a city ordinance. All witness fees and mileage paid by a defendant as part of the court costs ordered by the court to be paid shall be reimbursed to the county or city treasurer as appropriate.

(3) Any person accused of crime amounting to a misdemeanor or felony shall have compulsory process to enforce the attendance of witnesses in his or her behalf.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 461, p. 825;

Laws 1885, c. 106, § 1, p. 394;

R.S.1913, § 9101;

C.S.1922, § 10126;

C.S.1929, § 29-1903;

R.S.1943, § 29-1903;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 40;

Laws 2017, LB509, § 6.

Defendant may not be arbitrarily deprived of testimony that would have been relevant, material, and vital to the defense. State v. Cain, 223 Neb. 796, 393 N.W.2d 727 (1986).

Court may require showing of what testimony may be expected of prospective witness before entry of order for compulsory process. O'Rourke v. State, 166 Neb. 866, 90 N.W.2d 820 (1958).

Where testimony of witness was incompetent, failure to serve compulsory process was not prejudicial. Garcia v. State, 159 Neb. 571, 68 N.W.2d 151 (1955).

Liability of county arises only by express provisions of statute. Worthen v. Johnson County, 62 Neb. 754, 87 N.W. 909 (1901).